Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Penalties

177.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

177.230

to

177.310

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon arrest and conviction therefor, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

177.841

to

177.890

shall, in addition to any other penalty herein provided, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

In addition to any other penalty provided by KRS

177.910

to

177.950

, any person violating any order or provision of KRS

177.910

to

177.950

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Each day of violation of the provisions of KRS 177.910 to 177.950 shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates the weight provisions of KRS

177.9771

shall, upon conviction, be fined in an amount equal to three cents ($0.03) per pound when the excess is three thousand (3,000) pounds or less, five cents ($0.05) per pound when the excess exceeds three thousand (3,000) pounds but is less than four thousand (4,000) pounds, seven cents ($0.07) per pound when the excess exceeds four thousand (4,000) pounds but is less than five thousand (5,000) pounds, and nine cents ($0.09) per pound when the excess exceeds five thousand (5,000) pounds. In no case shall the fine be less than sixty dollars ($60) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

Any person who transports coal in violation of the weight provisions of KRS

189.221

and

189.222

and does not have a current decal or is not transporting coal under a valid cooperative agreement within KRS 177.9771(4)(f), shall, in addition to any applicable penalty prescribed by law, be fined five hundred dollars ($500) and be required to purchase the decal described in KRS 177.9771(4).

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS

177.305

shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 225, § 10; 1960, ch. 175, § 8; 1962, ch. 249, § 11; 1984, ch. 373, § 7(9), (10), effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 498, § 4, effective April 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 415, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 2000, ch. 512, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

177.999.
Prepayment of fines subject to certain conditions.

All offenses classified as violations under this chapter shall be prepayable except for:

An offense where evidence of the commission of the offense or another offense is seized by the officer and the citation is so marked and a court date set;

The offense may result in a license suspension or revocation;

The offense is cited with another offense that is not prepayable; or

An arrest is made under KRS

431.015

.

In the event that a prepayable offense is cited with another offense that is not prepayable, a court appearance shall be required on all of the offenses as required by KRS

431.452

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 512, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.